Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1240.01
False or forged documents; penalty.

Any person who files or attempts to file with the department any false or forged diploma or certificate or affidavit of identification or qualification shall be guilty of forgery.

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 56.